Hawaii, session 2025, HB1055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  The legislature finds that the devastating Maui wildfires on August 8, 2023, was one of the worst natural disasters in the State's history. The legislature further finds that in response to the growing threat of wildfires and other natural hazards, the public utilities commission plays a critical role in the State's efforts to strengthen critical infrastructure, mitigate risks, protect utility customers, and ensure robust recovery following extreme weather events. To effectively address these challenges, it is urgently imperative for the public utilities commission to strengthen the resilience and reliability of electric utility services in the State.  These initiatives will require consultants with specialized expertise to provide technical assessments, evaluations, and recommendations for mitigating storm-related power outages, restoring the grid, rebuilding Maui infrastructure, and preparing for direct impacts of other natural disasters to the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to make an emergency appropriation out of the public utilities commission special fund for the public utilities commission to procure the services of specialized consultants. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the public utilities commission special fund established by section 269-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2024-2025 to contract consultant services for utility dockets. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the public utilities commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.